lexicon/stems.lexc
!
! stems.lexc - Stem Templates
! Contains vowel-pattern skeletons for each binyan × conjugation
!

MULTICHAR-SYMBOLS
+I
+II
+III
+V1
+V2
+V3
%<perf%>
%<impf%>
%<impv%>
%<inf-c%>
%<inf-a%>
%<ptcp%>
%<qatal%>
%<yiqtol%>
%<way%>
%<weq%>
%<juss%>
%<coh%>

!
! Pattern representation: C = consonant, V = vowel, # = root position
! The root is intercalated between the pattern letters
!

! ============================================================
! QAL STEM TEMPLATES
! ============================================================

LEXICON qal

! Qal Perfect - qatal pattern: C_a_C_aC or C_oC
! Strong verb pattern: qatal
%<perf%>%.3ms:CaC        SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3fs:CaC        SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2ms:CaC        SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2fs:CaC        SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cs:CaC        SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3mp:CaC        SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2mp:CaC        SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cp:CvC        SUF ;

! Qal Imperfect - yiqtol pattern
%<impf%>%.3ms:yiCoC        PREF ;
%<impf%>%.3fs:yiCC      PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2ms:tiCoC     PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2fs:tiCC      PREF ;
%<impf%>%.1cs:3CoC       PREF ;
%<impf%>%.1cp:nCoC       PREF ;
%<impf%>%.3mp:yCoC       PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2mp:tiCC      PREF ;

! Qal Imperative
%<impv%>%.2ms:CoC        IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2fs:CoC        IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2mp:CvC       IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2fp:CoC       IMP_SUF ;

! Qal Infinitive Construct
%<inf-c%>:lCoC      INF_SUF ;

! Qal Infinitive Absolute  
%<inf-a%>:CoC       INF_ABS ;

! Qal Active Participle
%<ptcp%>%.ms:CoC        PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.fs:Cat       PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.mp:Cim       PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.fp:Cot       PTCP ;

! Qal Passive Participle (rare - usually niphal)
%<perf%>%.ms:CvC      PAS_PTCP ;

! ============================================================
! NIPHAL STEM TEMPLATES  
! ============================================================

LEXICON niphal

! Niphal Perfect
%<perf%>%.3ms:niCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3fs:niCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2ms:niCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2fs:niCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cs:niCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3mp:niCCv     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2mp:niCCv     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cp:niCCv     SUF ;

! Niphal Imperfect
%<impf%>%.3ms:yEinCoC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.3fs:yEinCC    PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2ms:tEinCoC  PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2fs:tEinCC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.1cs:3EinCoC  PREF ;
%<impf%>%.1cp:nEinCoC  PREF ;
%<impf%>%.3mp:yEinCoC  PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2mp:tEinCC   PREF ;

! Niphal Imperative
%<impv%>%.2ms:EinCoC   IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2fs:EinCC    IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2mp:EinCoC  IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2fp:EinCC    IMP_SUF ;

! Niphal Infinitive Construct
%<inf-c%>:liEnCC     INF_SUF ;

! Niphal Infinitive Absolute
%<inf-a%>:niEanCC    INF_ABS ;

! Niphal Active Participle
%<ptcp%>%.ms:nEit      PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.fs:nEit      PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.mp:nEit      PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.fp:nEit      PTCP ;

! ============================================================
! PIEL STEM TEMPLATES
! ============================================================

LEXICON piel

! Piel Perfect - geminated
%<perf%>%.3ms:CiCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3fs:CiCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2ms:CiCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2fs:CiCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cs:CiCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3mp:CiCCv     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2mp:CiCCv     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cp:CiCCv     SUF ;

! Piel Imperfect
%<impf%>%.3ms:yCaCCeC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.3fs:yCaCC     PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2ms:tCaCCeC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2fs:tCaCC     PREF ;
%<impf%>%.1cs:3CaCCeC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.1cp:nCaCCeC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.3mp:yCaCCeC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2mp:tCaCC     PREF ;

! Piel Imperative
%<impv%>%.2ms:CaCCeC    IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2fs:CaCC     IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2mp:CvCCeC    IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2fp:CaCC     IMP_SUF ;

! Piel Infinitive Construct  
%<inf-c%>:lCaCCel    INF_SUF ;

! Piel Infinitive Absolute
%<inf-a%>:CaCCel    INF_ABS ;

! Piel Active Participle
%<ptcp%>%.ms:mCoCCel    PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.fs:mCaCCat   PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.mp:mCoCCim   PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.fp:mCoCCot   PTCP ;

! ============================================================
! PUAL STEM TEMPLATES
! ============================================================

LEXICON pual

! Pual Perfect - geminated passive
%<perf%>%.3ms:CuCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3fs:CuCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2ms:CuCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2fs:CuCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cs:CuCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3mp:CuCCv     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2mp:CuCCv     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cp:CuCCv     SUF ;

! Pual Imperfect (rare)
%<impf%>%.3ms:yCuCCeC   PREF ;

! ============================================================
! HIPHIL STEM TEMPLATES
! ============================================================

LEXICON hiphil

! Hiphil Perfect - ה prefix
%<perf%>%.3ms:hiCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3fs:hiCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2ms:hiCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2fs:hiCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cs:hiCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3mp:hiCCv     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2mp:hiCCv     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cp:hiCCv     SUF ;

! Hiphil Imperfect
%<impf%>%.3ms:yhaCCeC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.3fs:yhiCC     PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2ms:thaCCeC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2fs:thiCC    PREF ;
%<impf%>%.1cs:3haCCeC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.1cp:nhaCCeC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.3mp:yhaCCeC   PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2mp:thiCC    PREF ;

! Hiphil Imperative
%<impv%>%.2ms:haCCeC    IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2fs:hiCC     IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2mp:hvCCeC   IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2fp:hiCC     IMP_SUF ;

! Hiphil Infinitive Construct
%<inf-c%>:lhACCl    INF_SUF ;

! Hiphil Infinitive Absolute
%<inf-a%>:haCCel    INF_ABS ;

! Hiphil Active Participle  
%<ptcp%>%.ms:mCoaC     PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.fs:mCat      PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.mp:mCoam     PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.fp:mCoat     PTCP ;

! ============================================================
! HOPHAL STEM TEMPLATES
! ============================================================

LEXICON hophal

! Hophal Perfect - הוּ prefix
%<perf%>%.3ms:huCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3fs:huCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2ms:huCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2fs:huCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cs:huCCa     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3mp:huCCv     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2mp:huCCv     SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cp:huCCv     SUF ;

! ============================================================
! HITHPAEL STEM TEMPLATES
! ============================================================

LEXICON hithpael

! Hithpael Perfect - הת prefix + dagesh
%<perf%>%.3ms:hitCaCCa   SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3fs:hitCaCCa   SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2ms:hitCaCCa   SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2fs:hitCaCCa   SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cs:hitCaCCa   SUF ;
%<perf%>%.3mp:hitCaCCv   SUF ;
%<perf%>%.2mp:hitCaCCv   SUF ;
%<perf%>%.1cp:hitCaCCv   SUF ;

! Hithpael Imperfect
%<impf%>%.3ms:yitCaCCeC  PREF ;
%<impf%>%.3fs:yithCC    PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2ms:titCaCCeC  PREF ;
%<impf%>%.2fs:tithCC    PREF ;
%<impf%>%.1cs:3itCaCCeC  PREF ;
%<impf%>%.1cp:nitTaCCeC  PREF ;

! Hithpael Imperative
%<impv%>%.2ms:hitCaCCeC  IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2fs:hitCC    IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2mp:hitcvCCeC IMP_SUF ;
%<impv%>%.2fp:hitCC    IMP_SUF ;

! Hithpael Infinitive Construct
%<inf-c%>:lhitTaCCel INF_SUF ;

! Hithpael Active Participle
%<ptcp%>%.ms:mitCaCCel PTCP ;
%<ptcp%>%.fs:mitCat   PTCP ;

! ============================================================
! SUFFIX SLOTS FOR AGREEMENT
! ============================================================

LEXICON SUF
! Perfect suffixes attach here
# ;

LEXICON PREF
! Imperfect prefixes come before these
# ;

LEXICON IMP_SUF
! Imperative suffixes
# ;

LEXICON INF_SUF
! Infinitive construct suffixes
# ;

LEXICON INF_ABS
! Infinitive absolute - no suffixes
# ;

LEXICON PTCP
! Participle endings
# ;
